Washington statutes.
RCW 36.05.050

Court may establish boundary line.

The court shall have power to move or establish such boundary line on any government section line or subdivisional line thereof, of the section in or through which said disputed, lost, obscure or uncertain boundary line may be located, or if such boundary line is in unsurveyed territory, then the court shall have power to move or establish such boundary line so it will conform to extensions of government section lines already surveyed in that vicinity.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.05.050. Prior: 1897 c 76 s 6; RRS s 3969.]